Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 3. Statewide Human Services Information and Referral Program.

§ 63.2-222.
Establishment of system.

There shall be created a statewide human services information and referral system designed to:

Collect and maintain accurate and complete resource data on a statewide basis;

Link citizens needing human services with appropriate community resources to satisfy those needs;

Assist in planning for human services delivery at the local, regional and state levels; and

Provide information to assist decision-makers in allocating financial and other resources to respond to state and local human service priorities.

History.

1984, c. 402, § 63.1-314.1; 2002, c. 747.

§§ 63.2-223 through 63.2-225.
Repealed by Acts 2003, cc. 54 and 75.

Editor’s note.

Former §

63.2-223

, which created the Human Services Information and Referral Advisory Council, was derived 1984, c. 402, § 63.1-314.2; 2002, c. 747.
Former § 63.2-224, pertaining to members of the Council, was derived from 1984, c. 402, § 63.1-314.3; 1985, c. 19; 1989, c. 733; 1990, cc. 458, 915; 1994, c. 64; 2002, c. 747. Former § 63.2-225, pertaining to duties of Council, was derived from 1984, c. 402, § 63.1-314.4; 1990, c. 915; 2002, c. 747.

Repealed § 63.2-224 was amended by Acts 2003, c. 467.

§ 63.2-226.
Duties of Department.

The Department shall assume administrative responsibilities for the statewide system. In this capacity, the Department shall establish an office to:

Develop a plan for the design and implementation of a statewide human services information and referral program;

Coordinate and supervise the implementation and operation of the information and referral program;

Coordinate funding for the system;

Select regional providers of information and referral services;

Supervise coordination of information management among information and referral regions across the Commonwealth;

Encourage effective relationships between the system and state and local agencies and public and private organizations;

Develop and implement a statewide publicity effort;

Provide training, technical assistance, research, and consultation for regional and local information and referral centers, and to localities interested in developing information and referral services;

Determine a core level of services to be funded from state government resources;

Coordinate standardization of resource data collection, maintenance and dissemination;

Stimulate and encourage the availability of statewide information and referral services;

Develop and implement a program for monitoring and assessing the performance and success of the information and referral program; and

Collect information on child-specific payments made through the Title IV-E foster care program and submit information, when available, to the Office of Children’s Services.

The Department, in consultation with the Virginia Employment Commission and Virginia Community College System, shall develop and implement a plan for the provision to citizens receiving any form of public assistance of information regarding courses on financial literacy, offered online or through any other appropriate medium, that are available to such citizens at no cost to them.

History.

1984, c. 402, § 63.1-314.5; 1990, c. 915; 2002, c. 747; 2003, cc. 54, 75; 2008, c. 277; 2015, cc. 366, 521.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 54 and 75 are identical, and deleted “in conformance with standards and policies recommended by the Council” at the end of the first sentence of the first paragraph; deleted former subsection 1, which read: “Provide staff support to the Council” and renumbered the remaining subsections accordingly; deleted “conforming to the standards and policies recommended by the Council and submit the plan to the Council for review” at the end of subsection 1; and deleted “and present an annual report to the Council evaluating the effectiveness of the system” at the end of subsection 12.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 277 added subdivision 13; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 366 substituted “Office of Children’s Services” for “Office of Comprehensive Services for At-Risk Youth and Families” in subdivision 13.

The 2015 amendment by c. 521 inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B.

§ 63.2-227.
Regional providers; duties.

There shall be established a regional system of providers of information and referral services. The Department shall select the regional providers.

The regional providers shall:

Collect, maintain and disseminate resource data;

Provide citizen access to information about resources throughout the Commonwealth;

Assist in planning functions by providing selected data to the Department on a regular basis;

Provide data to public and private agencies other than the Department on a contractual basis;

Cooperate with the state administering agency;

Seek funds from available sources;

Maintain effective relationships between the system and state and local agencies and public and private organizations; and

When feasible and appropriate and within the limits of available funds, establish satellite offices or develop cooperative agreements with local information and referral groups and resource and referral groups that can assist the regional providers in performing their duties and responsibilities.

History.

1984, c. 402, § 63.1-314.6; 1990, c. 915; 2002, c. 747; 2003, cc. 54, 75.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 54 and 75 are identical, and in the last sentence of the first paragraph deleted “Council shall define the boundaries of the regions, and the” preceding “Department” and deleted “according to standards and policies established by the Council” at the end.

§ 63.2-228.
Repealed by Acts 2003, cc. 54 and 75.

Editor’s note.

Former §

63.2-228

, which created the Technical Assistance Committee, derived from 1990, c. 915, § 63.1-314.8; 1991, c. 563; 1996, c. 492; 2002, cc. 572, 747.